espanish.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+V +Inf +1p +2p +3p +Masc +Fem +Sing +Plur

! Lexicon with root stems:
LEXICON Root
 am V ;
 cant V ;
 habl V ;
 cambi V ;
 llam V ;
 tir V ;
 bail V ;
 baj V ;
 camin V ;
 escuch V ;
 perr N ;
 gat N ;
 cerd N ;
 ingenier N ;
 mecánic N ;
 os N ;
 lob N ;
 médic N ;
 maestr N ;
 abogad N ;

! Lexicon containing verb POS tags:
LEXICON V
+V: V-suff ;

! LEXICON containing noun POS tags:
LEXICON N
+N: N-suff ;

! Lexicon containing conjugational suffixes and tags for verbs:
LEXICON V-suff
+Inf:ar # ;
+1p+Sing:o  # ;
+1p+Plur:amos   # ;
+2p+Sing:as # ;
+2p+Plur:áis    # ;
+3p+Sing:a  # ;
+3p+Plur:an # ;

! Lexicon containing inflectional suffixes and  tags for nouns:
LEXICON N-suff
+Masc+Sing:o    # ;
+Masc+Plur:os   # ;
+Fem+Sing:a # ;
+Fem+Plur:as    # ;

! The format for verbs is root+V+person+number. They are all -ar verbs in present tense indicative.
! The format for nouns is root+N+gender+number
! Verb roots include cant-, am-, habl-, cambi- and tir-
! Noun roots include perr-, gat-, ingenier-, cerd-, and mecánic-
! Example verb: cant+V+2p+Sing = cantas
! Example noun: cerd+N+Fem+Plur = cerdas
